Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.45.020

University of Washington Tacoma—University of Washington Bothell.

(1) The University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the expansion of baccalaureate and graduate educational programs in the central Puget Sound area under rules or guidelines adopted by the student achievement council and in accordance with proportionality agreements emphasizing access for transfer students developed with the state board for community and technical colleges. The University of Washington shall meet that responsibility through the operation of at least two campuses. One campus shall be located in the Tacoma area. Another campus shall be collocated with Cascadia Community College in the Bothell-Woodinville area.

(2) At the University of Washington Tacoma, a top priority is expansion of upper-division capacity for transfer students and graduate capacity and programs. Beginning in the fall of 2006, the campus may offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields not addressed at local community colleges. The campus shall admit lower division students through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with a community college, or through direct transfer for students who have accumulated approximately one year of transferable college credits. In addition to offering lower division courses linked to specific majors as addressed above, the campus may also directly admit first-year students and sophomores.

(3) At the University of Washington Bothell, a top priority is expansion of upper-division capacity for transfer students and graduate capacity and programs. The campus shall also seek additional opportunities to collaborate with and maximize its colocation with Cascadia Community College. Beginning in the fall of 2006, the campus may offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields not addressed at local community colleges. The campus may admit lower division students through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with a community college, or through direct transfer for students who have accumulated approximately one year of transferable college credits. In addition to offering lower division courses linked to specific majors as addressed above, the campus may also directly admit first-year students and sophomores.

[ 2017 c 52 s 6; 2013 c 23 s 54; 2012 c 229 s 532; 2005 c 258 s 3; 1994 c 217 s 3; 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Findings—Intent—2005 c 258: See note following RCW 28B.45.014.

Effective date—1994 c 217: See note following RCW 28B.45.0201.